Utah statutes.
35A-3-307.   Cash assistance to a single minor parent.

(1)  The division may provide cash assistance to a single minor parent in accordance with this section.

(2)  A single minor parent who receives cash assistance under this part shall:

(a)  reside in a place of residence maintained by a parent, legal guardian, or other adult relative of the single minor parent, except as provided in Subsection (3);

(b)  participate in education for parenting and life skills;

(c)  participate in infant and child wellness programs operated by the Department of Health; and

(d)  for not less than 20 hours per week:

(i)  attend high school or an alternative to high school, if the single minor parent does not have a high school diploma;

(ii)  participate in education or training; or

(iii)  participate in a combination of employment and education or training.

(3) (a)  If the division determines that the requirements of Subsection (2)(a) are not appropriate for a single minor parent, the division may assist the single minor parent to obtain suitable living arrangements, including an adult-supervised living arrangement.

(b)  As a condition of receiving cash assistance, a single minor parent who is exempt from the requirements of Subsection (2)(a) shall reside in a living arrangement that is approved by the division.

(c)  The approval by the division of a living arrangement under Subsection (3)(b):

(i)  is a means of safeguarding the use of state and federal funds; and

(ii)  is not a certification or guarantee of the safety, quality, or condition of the living arrangements of the single minor parent.

(4) (a)  If a single minor parent resides with a parent, the division shall include the income of the parent of the single minor parent in determining the single minor parent's eligibility for services and supports under this part.

(b)  If a single minor parent receives services and supports under this chapter but does not reside with a parent, the division shall seek an order under Title 78B, Chapter 12, Utah Child Support Act, requiring the parent of the single minor parent to financially support the single minor parent.

(5)  The requirements of this section shall be included in a single minor parent's employment plan under Section 35A-3-304.



Amended by Chapter 296, 2010 General Session

